Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 2. Enforcement.

Sec. 25.30.400.
Enforcement under the Hague Convention.

Under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

, a court of this state may enforce an order for the return of a child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if the order were a child custody determination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.410.
Duty to enforce.

A court of this state shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a court of another state if the court of the other state exercised jurisdiction in substantial conformity with this chapter or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this chapter and the determination has not been modified in accordance with this chapter.

A court of this state may use a remedy available under other law of this state to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state. The procedure provided by AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

does not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.420.
Temporary visitation.

A court of this state that does not have jurisdiction to modify a child custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing

a visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

the visitation provisions of a child custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

If a court of this state makes an order under (a)(2) of this section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified in AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.430.
Registration of child custody determination.

A child custody determination issued by a court of another state may be registered in this state, with or without a simultaneous request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate court in this state

a letter or other document requesting registration;

two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered and a statement, under penalty of perjury, that to the best knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration the order has not been modified; and

except as otherwise provided in AS

25.30.380

, the name and address of the person seeking registration and the parent or person acting as a parent who has been awarded custody or visitation in the child custody determination sought to be registered.

On receipt of the documents required by (a) of this section, the registering court shall

cause the determination to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of any accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form; and

serve notice on the persons named under (a)(3) of this section and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration under this section.

The notice required by (b)(2) of this section must state that

a registered determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in the same manner as a determination issued by a court of this state;

a hearing to contest the validity of the registered determination must be requested within 20 days after service of notice; and

failure to contest the registration will result in confirmation of the child custody determination and preclude further contest of that determination with respect to a matter that could have been asserted.

A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered order must request a hearing within 20 days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the court shall confirm the registered order unless the person contesting registration establishes that

the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

;

the child custody determination sought to be registered has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

; or

the person contesting registration was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.840

in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which registration is sought.

If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter of law, and the person requesting registration and all persons served must be notified of the confirmation.

Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to a matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.440.
Enforcement of registered determination.

A court of this state may grant relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify except in accordance with AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

, a registered child custody determination of a court of another state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.450.
Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

is commenced in a court of this state and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement continues unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.460.
Expedited enforcement of child custody determination.

A petition under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

must be verified. A certified copy, or a copy of a certified copy, of the orders sought to be enforced and of an order, if any, confirming registration must be attached to the petition.

A petition for enforcement of a child custody determination must state

whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied on in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this chapter and, if so, must identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

whether a proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, must identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

the present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and attorney fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

if the child custody determination has been registered and confirmed under AS

25.30.430

, the date and place of registration.

On the filing of a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person with or without the child at a hearing and may enter an order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing must be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request of the petitioner.

An order issued under (c) of this section must state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that, at the hearing, the court will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child and the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under AS

25.30.500

and may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate unless the respondent appears and establishes that

the child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under AS

25.30.430

, and that

the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

;

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

; or

the respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.840

in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under AS

25.30.430

but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under provisions substantially similar to AS 25.30.300 — 25.30.390.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.470.
Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

25.30.490

, the petition and order shall be served, by a method authorized by the law of this state, on the respondent and a person who has physical custody of the child.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.480.
Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order under AS

25.30.330

, on a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that

the child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under AS

25.30.430

and that

the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

;

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

or provisions substantially similar to AS 25.30.300 — 25.30.390; or

the respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with AS

25.30.840

or provisions substantially similar to AS 25.30.300 — 25.30.390 in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under AS

25.30.430

but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under AS 25.30.300 — 25.30.390 or provisions substantially similar to AS 25.30.300 — 25.30.390.

The court shall award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under AS

25.30.500

and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.490.
Warrant to take physical custody of child.

On the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of the child if the child is imminently likely either to suffer serious physical harm or to be removed from this state.

If the court, on the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or to be removed from this state, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition must be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the warrant must include the statements required for petitions under AS

25.30.460(b)

.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child must

recite the facts on which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the state is based;

direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

The respondent must be served with the petition, warrant, and order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions on placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child’s custodian.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.500.
Costs, fees, and expenses.

To the extent authorized by court rules, the court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care expenses incurred during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom costs, fees, or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

The court may not assess costs, fees, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this chapter or by court rule.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.510.
Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall give full faith and credit to an order issued by another state consistent with this chapter if the order enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

or provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.390

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.520.
Appeals.

An appeal taken from a final order in a proceeding under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

shall be given calendar priority to the extent allowed for other civil appellate cases and shall be handled expeditiously. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under AS

25.30.330

, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on court rules, see § 6, ch. 133, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.30.590.
Definitions.

In AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

,

“petitioner” means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for the return of the child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination;

“respondent” means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for the return of the child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)